Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6835
Refunds; interest not allowable.

Interest shall not be allowable on any refunds paid because of benefits earned under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 35.